Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
During the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  all lottery revenues available to
benefit the public purposes specified in Article XV,  section 4, of the Oregon Constitution,
that are in excess of distributions or allocations required by law shall be maintained  in the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund.
SECTION 2. All moneys  in the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund as
of July 1, 2021,  and thereafter are reserved to meet the commitments of sections 1 to 13 of
this 2021 Act.
SECTION 3. The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021,
from the Administrative Services Economic  Development Fund, to the Oregon Business De-
velopment Department, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 10,938,127
(2) Business, innovation
and trade................................... $ 83,591,268
(3) Infrastructure ........................... $ 4,384,506
(4) Oregon Film and Video Office .. $ 1,419,830
SECTION 4. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the Department of Education, for  the
State School Fund, the amount of $589,526,746.
SECTION 5. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the office of  the Governor, the amount
of $4,552,709 for expenses of the Regional Solutions Program.
SECTION 6. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  establish a
process for allocating available moneys in the Administrative Services Economic  Develop-
ment Fund on a quarterly basis to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 1 to 13 of
this 2021 Act. The department shall set the quarterly allocations.
(2) If, in any quarter, the moneys transferred from the  State Lottery Fund to the Ad-
ministrative Services Economic Development Fund  are insufficient to pay for the quarterly
allocations made by sections 1 to 13 of this 2021 Act  or any other 2021 Act, prior to making
any other allocations pursuant to sections  1 to 13 of this 2021 Act, the department shall
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 1
satisfy lottery  bond debt service obligations in the amount of $278,511,961 for outstanding
lottery bonds.
(3) After the lottery bond debt service obligations described  in subsection (2) of this
section are satisfied, if the remaining  moneys transferred from the State Lottery Fund to
the Administrative Services  Economic Development Fund are insufficient to pay for the
quarterly allocations made by sections 1 to  13 of this 2021 Act, the department shall reduce
the quarterly allocations not described in subsection (2) of this section  proportionately in
amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 7. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Admin-
istrative Services Economic Development Fund, to  the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, the amount  of $278,511,961 for the purpose of paying, when due, the principal, in-
terest and premium, if any, on  outstanding lottery bonds, as described in section 6 of this
2021 Act.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.547 (1) for  a
percentage-based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  the amount
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the  Oregon De-
partment of  Administrative Services for distribution to counties for economic development
activities as provided by ORS 461.547 is $54,209,527.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.549 (2) for  a
percentage-based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  the amount
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund  to the Problem
Gambling Treatment Fund is $16,514,510.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding and in  lieu of the requirement in ORS 565.447 for a
percentage-based transfer of  moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, the amount
allocated from the Administrative  Services Economic Development Fund to the County Fair
Account established in ORS 565.445 is $3,828,000.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the allocation described in section 2 (3),
chapter 2, Oregon Laws  2017 (Ballot Measure 99 (2016)), for a percentage-based transfer of
moneys with an annual cap, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, the amount allocated
from the Administrative Services Economic  Development Fund to the Outdoor School Edu-
cation Fund is $49,418,728.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the requirement in ORS 461.543 (4) for a
percentage-based transfer of moneys, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  the amount
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the  Sports Lot-
tery Account is $16,514,607.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding and in lieu of the allocation described in section 44, chap-
ter 355, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended by section 1,  chapter 10, Oregon Laws 2021, for the
biennium beginning July 1,  2021, the amount allocated from the Administrative Services
Economic Development Fund to the Employer Incentive Fund is $12,665,769.
SECTION 14. There are allocated  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to  the Veterans’ Department of Veterans’ Affairs Dedicated Lot-
tery Fund, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Veterans’ Services Program ..... $ 12,628,046
(2) County Veterans’ Service
Officers ..................................... $ 7,474,669
(3) National Service
Organizations............................ $ 497,880
SECTION 14a. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the Bureau of Labor  and Industries, the amount of $261,416 for
veterans’ employment apprenticeship outreach and coordination.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 2
SECTION 14b. There is allocated for the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the Oregon  Criminal Justice Commission, the amount of $578,865
for veterans’ specialty courts.
SECTION 14c. There is allocated  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the
Veterans’ Services Fund, to the Oregon Health Authority, the  amount of $2,127,476 for
veterans’ behavioral health services.
SECTION 15. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services  shall establish a
process for allocating  available moneys in the Veterans’ Services Fund on a quarterly basis
to fulfill the biennial allocations made by sections 14 to 14c of this 2021 Act.
(2) If the moneys transferred from the  State Lottery Fund to the Veterans’ Services
Fund are insufficient to pay for the quarterly allocations  under subsection (1) of this section,
the department shall reduce the quarterly allocations proportionately  in amounts sufficient
to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding ORS 137.300, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, the
Department of Revenue shall distribute the moneys in  the Criminal Fine Account established
by ORS 137.300 as specified in sections 17 to 21 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 17. There are allocated to the Department of Public Safety  Standards and
Training for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Criminal Fine Account, the fol-
lowing amounts for the following purposes:
(1) Criminal justice training
and standards operations.......... $ 43,257,427
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ... $ 279,677
SECTION 18.
There are allocated  to the Department of Justice for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2021, from the Criminal Fine Account, the following  amounts for the following
purposes:
(1) Child Abuse Multidisciplinary
Intervention Account ................ $ 11,694,249
(2) Creation and operation of a
statewide system of regional
assessment centers as
provided under ORS 418.746
to 418.796................................... $ 883,388
(3) Criminal Injuries
Compensation Account ............. $ 9,846,982
(4) Services to children eligible
for compensation under
ORS 147.390 and costs to
administer provision of
these services ........................... $ 747,739
SECTION 19.
There are allocated to the Department of Human Services for  the biennium
beginning July 1, 2021, from the Criminal Fine Account, the following amounts for  the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Domestic Violence Fund
established in ORS 409.300
for the purpose of
ORS 409.292 (1)(a) to (c) ............ $ 2,320,336
(2) Sexual Assault Victims Fund .... $ 556,265
SECTION 20.
There are allocated to the State Court Facilities  and Security Account es-
tablished under ORS 1.178, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, from the Criminal Fine
Account, the following amounts for the following purposes:
(1) State court security
and emergency preparedness .... $ 4,147,778
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 3
(2) Distributions to county court
facilities security accounts ....... $ 3,057,584
SECTION 21. (1) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2021, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $42,884 for the purpose
of grants under ORS 430.345 for the establishment, operation  and maintenance of alcohol and
drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services provided through  a county.
(2) There is allocated to the Law Enforcement  Medical Liability Account established un-
der ORS  414.815, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Criminal Fine Account,
the amount of $1,300,000.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon State Police  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,
from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $351,572 for the purpose of enforcing the laws
relating to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(4) There is allocated to the Department  of Corrections for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, from the Criminal  Fine Account, the amount of $4,846,812 for the purpose of plan-
ning, operating and maintaining county juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities
and drug and alcohol programs. Notwithstanding ORS 137.300 (4), the grant to each county
shall be based  on the formula used to determine the distribution of moneys under the
Grant-in-Aid Program under ORS 423.530.
(5) There is allocated to the State  Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the  Criminal Fine Account, the amount of
$3,887,500.
(6) There is allocated to  the Intoxicated Driver Program Fund created under ORS 813.270,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of
$4,323,000.
(7) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium  beginning July
1, 2021, from the Criminal Fine Account, the  amount of $331,824 for the Emergency Medical
Services and Trauma Systems Program created under ORS 431A.085.
(8) There is allocated to the  Department of Revenue for the biennium beginning July 1,
2021, from the Criminal Fine  Account, the amount of $100,000 for administrative costs of the
department.
SECTION 22.
After distributing the amounts specified in sections 17 to 21  of this 2021
Act, the Department of  Revenue shall distribute funds remaining in the Criminal Fine Ac-
count to the General Fund.
SECTION 23. (1) There  is allocated to the State School Fund established under ORS
327.008, for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the
amount of $36,000,000.
(2) There is allocated to the Oregon Health  Authority, for mental health treatment or for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early intervention and treatment
services, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from  the Oregon Marijuana Account, the
amount of $18,000,000.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon  Health Authority, for the health systems division,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the  amount
of $4,500,000 for purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse  prevention, early intervention
and treatment services.
(4) There  is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount  of $249,360,000, for deposit into the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund.
(5) There is allocated to  the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for the
biennium beginning July  1, 2021, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of
$13,500,000.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 4
SECTION 24. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5533 (SB 5533-A) Page 5